New York, session 2025-2026, A6241.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The city council of a city with a population of one million 2 or more shall conduct a study, in consultation with local agencies 3 responsible for transportation, city planning, environmental protection 4 and any other local agency which the city council deems necessary, to 5 examine the feasibility and impact of constructing new urban consol- 6 idation centers and shared use locker technologies or retrofitting 7 existing spaces to accommodate such centers and locker technologies 8 including, but not limited to, the following: 9 (a) Explore the possibility of reducing truck traffic in residential 10 neighborhoods by creating urban consolidation centers, including through 11 public-private partnerships. 12 (b) Assess the application of urban consolidation centers to service 13 high-rise buildings, districts with high pedestrian volumes, and 14 locations with constrained delivery infrastructure. 15 (c) Explore shared use locker storage technologies for improved last 16 mile goods delivery. 17 (d) Evaluate the feasibility of authorizing the operation of shared 18 use lockers in the public right of way, on city-owned property, or in 19 partnership with private entities for improved freight distribution 20 efficiency and service effectiveness. 21 (e) Explore the existing spaces that can accommodate urban consol- 22 idated centers and shared use locker technologies, and evaluate the 23 possibility for their retrofitting. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02312-01-5 A. 6241 2 1 (f) Identify the needs to increase the use of urban consolidation 2 centers and shared use locker technologies and the impact that they 3 could have on reducing vehicle miles traveled. 4 § 2. For purposes of this act: (a) "urban consolidation centers" shall 5 mean specially designed places or facilities that combine multiple 6 deliveries from different suppliers to a central location to be deliv- 7 ered inside the service area; and 8 (b) "shared use locker technologies" shall mean the final delivery 9 locations in a neighborhood which are used to consolidate packages to a 10 single location with lockers (including parcel lockers, automated parcel 11 lockers, smart lockers, etc.) for pick-up by a consumer. 12 § 3. Within one year of the effective date of this act, the city coun- 13 cil of any city with a population of one million or more shall publish a 14 report by posting it in a clear and conspicuous location online with the 15 findings and recommendations of the study conducted pursuant to section 16 one of this act, as well as deliver the report to the legislature. 17 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.